Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 18
COSTS IN CRIMINAL ACTIONS

Cross references:

For items includable as costs in criminal actions, see § 18-1.3-701; for items includable as costs in civil actions, see § 13-16-122; for security for costs of apprehension of fugitives, see § 16-19-129; for docket fees and clerks' costs, see § 13-32-105; for compensation of reporters, see § 13-5-128; for jury fees, see § 13-33-101; for witness fees, see § 13-33-102.

Section

16-18-101. Costs in criminal cases.

The costs in criminal cases shall be paid by the state pursuant to section 13-3-104, C.R.S., when the defendant is acquitted or when the defendant is convicted and the court determines he is unable to pay them.

The costs of preliminary hearings, including any reporters' transcripts thereof ordered by a defendant, shall be paid pursuant to subsection (1) of this section. Reporters' transcripts of preliminary hearings which are ordered by the prosecution shall be paid for by the prosecution, unless otherwise ordered by the court.

The department of corrections, from annual appropriations made by the general assembly, shall reimburse the county or counties in a judicial district for the costs of prosecuting any crime alleged to have been committed by a person in the custody of the department. The county or counties shall certify these costs to the department, and upon approval of the executive director of the department, the costs shall be paid. The provisions of this subsection (3) shall apply to costs that are not otherwise paid by the state.

Source:

L. 1876:

p. 53, § 1.

G.L.

§ 349.

G.S.

§ 422.

L. 1889:

p. 99, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1077.

C.L.

§ 6593.

CSA:

C. 43, § 23.

CRS 53:

§ 33-2-1.

L. 59:

p. 342, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 33-2-1.

L. 71:

p. 319, § 1.

L. 77:

(3) amended, p. 903, § 9, effective August 1.

L. 79:

(2) amended, p. 601, § 28, effective July 1.

16-18-102. Costs taxed against complainant.

If any informer or complainant under a penal statute of this state, to whom the penalty or any part thereof, if recovered, is given, dismisses his suit or prosecution, or fails in the same, or willfully absents himself from trial or examination, he shall be adjudged to pay all costs accruing on such suit or prosecution, unless he is an officer whose duty it is to make and file the information or complaint; but in all cases of examination into any criminal charge before a county judge, where the party accused is discharged, and it appears to the judge before whom such examination was made that there was no reasonable ground for the complaint, or that it was maliciously entered, and in all cases where the complaining witness willfully absents himself from or fails to appear at such examination or trial, the county judge shall give judgment against the complainant for all costs of the examination or trial and shall issue execution thereon. Appeal may be had in all such cases, as provided by law for the taking of appeals from judgments rendered in county courts.

Source:

G.L.

§ 347.

G.S.

§ 421.

L. 1893:

p. 93, § 1.

R.S. 08:

§ 1078.

C.L.

§ 6594.

CSA:

C. 43, § 24.

CRS 53:

§ 33-2-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 33-2-2.

L. 64:

p. 220, § 45.

16-18-103. When taxed against informant before grand jury.

If any person complains to any grand jury of injury done to his person, or to any person of his household, or to his property, done by another, and upon hearing evidence of the charge it appears to the grand jury that the same is untrue, and that it was maliciously entered, it is the duty of the grand jury to return the facts into court, and the court shall thereupon tax the costs incurred in the investigation of the charge and enter judgment against the person who made the complaint for the amount thereof. In proceedings under this section, the action of the grand jury shall be determined by twelve members thereof.

Source:

L. 1872:

p. 96, § 1.

G.L.

§ 344.

G.S.

§ 418.

R.S. 08:

§ 1079.

C.L.

§ 6595.

CSA:

C. 43, § 25.

CRS 53:

§ 33-2-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 33-2-3.

16-18-104. Prosecuting witness before grand jury liable - when.

If any person complains to any grand jury of injury done to his person, or to any person of his household, or to his property, and after indictment found does not appear in the court in which the indictment is pending to give evidence in that behalf against the party charged in the indictment, and the party charged is acquitted, or if proceedings under said indictment are discontinued for want of testimony, the court in which the indictment is pending shall give judgment against the person who preferred the complaint for the costs arising in that case. Upon the trial of the party charged in any such indictment, if he is acquitted and the jury finds that the proceeding was maliciously commenced, the court shall give judgment against the prosecuting witness for the costs arising in the case. Whenever any person complains, the grand jury shall cause the name of the person so complaining to be endorsed upon the indictment, with the words "prosecuting witness" added, and this shall be evidence that the complaint was made by the person whose name is thus endorsed.

Source:

L. 1872:

p. 96, § 2.

G.L.

§ 345.

G.S.

§ 419.

R.S. 08:

§ 1080.

C.L.

§ 6596.

CSA:

C. 43, § 26.

CRS 53:

§ 33-2-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 33-2-4.

16-18-105. Enforcing judgment.

Judgment rendered under the provisions of sections 16-18-103 and 16-18-104 may be enforced in the same manner as in other criminal cases.

Source:

L. 1872:

p. 97, § 3.

G.L.

§ 346.

G.S.

§ 420.

R.S. 08:

§ 1081.

C.L.

§ 6597.

CSA:

C. 43, § 27.

CRS 53:

§ 33-2-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 33-2-5.